Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.483

Low-income home rehabilitation grant program.

(1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the low-income home rehabilitation grant program is created within the department.

(2) The program must include the following elements:

(a) Eligible homeowners must be low-income and live in rural areas.

(b) Homeowners who are senior citizens, persons with disabilities, families with children five years old and younger, and veterans must receive priority for grants.

(c) The cost of the home rehabilitation must be the lesser of:

(i) 80 percent of the assessed or appraised value of the property post rehabilitation, whichever is greater; or

(ii) $50,000.

(d) The maximum amount that may be granted under this program may not exceed the cost of the home rehabilitation as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(3) The department must adopt rules for implementation of this grant program.

[ 2023 c 380 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 380 ss 1-6: "Sections 1 through 6 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 380 s 9.]